Washington statutes.
RCW 43.05.160

Liquor and cannabis board—Notice of correction.

(1) If, during an inspection or visit to a cannabis business licensed under chapter 69.50 RCW that is not a technical assistance visit, the liquor and cannabis board becomes aware of conditions that are not in compliance with applicable laws and rules enforced by the board and are not subject to civil penalties as provided for in RCW 69.50.563, the board may issue a notice of correction to the licensee that includes:

(a) A description of the condition that is not in compliance and the text of the specific section or subsection of the applicable state law or rule;

(b) A statement of what is required to achieve compliance;

(c) The date by which the board requires compliance to be achieved;

(d) Notice of the means to contact any technical assistance services provided by the board or others; and

(e) Notice of when, where, and to whom a request to extend the time to achieve compliance for good cause may be filed with the board.

(2) A notice of correction is not a formal enforcement action, is not subject to appeal, and is a public record.

(3) If the liquor and cannabis board issues a notice of correction, it may not issue a civil penalty for the violations identified in the notice of correction unless the licensee fails to comply with the notice.

[ 2022 c 16 s 32; 2019 c 394 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.

Findings—2019 c 394: See note following RCW 69.50.563.